District of Columbia statutes.
34-208

“Extension or extensions” defined.

The term “extension or extensions” when used in this subtitle shall include the reasonable extension of the service and facilities of every street railroad, street railroad corporation, gas plant, gas company, electric plant, electrical corporation, telephone corporation, telephone line, telegraph line, and telegraph corporation as the same are defined in this subtitle.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 974, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-227, § 17(a)(2), 51 DCR 10549

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-208.
1973 Ed., § 43-108.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-227 substituted “gas company” for “gas corporation”.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 7(b) of Prevention of Unauthorized Switching of Customer Natural Gas Accounts Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-13, July 10, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 6589).